Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0228.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 7134. (1) Beginning July 1, 2026, a school shall not provide, sell, offer for sale, or make available to a student a food that contains any of the following: (a) Brominated vegetable oil. (b) Potassium bromate. (c) Propylparaben. (d) Titanium dioxide. (e) Any of the following dyes: (i) Red 40. (ii) Green 3. (iii) Blue 1. (iv) Blue 2. (v) Yellow 6. (2) As used in this section, "school" means a public school or a nonpublic school as those terms are defined in section 5 of the revised school code, 1976 PA 451, MCL 380.5.